src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PronounRoot
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ObvPl@ PRONDem+NA+ObvPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ObvSg@ PRONDem+NA+ObvSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ProxPl@ PRONDem+NA+ProxPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ProxSg@ PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NI+Pl@ PRONDem+NI+Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDem+NI+Sg@ PRONDem+NI+Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ObvPl@ PRONDub+NA+ObvPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ObvSg@ PRONDub+NA+ObvSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ProxPl@ PRONDub+NA+ProxPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ProxSg@ PRONDub+NA+ProxSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NI+Pl@ PRONDub+NI+Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONDub+NI+Sg@ PRONDub+NI+Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NA+ProxPl@ PRONIndf+NA+ProxPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NA@ PRONIndf+NA_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NI@ PRONIndf+NI_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ObvPl@ PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ObvSg@ PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ProxPl@ PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ProxSg@ PRONInter+NA+ProxSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA@ PRONInter+NA_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NI+Pl@ PRONInter+NI+Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONInter+NI+Sg@ PRONInter+NI+Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+1Sg@ PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+2Pl@ PRONPer+NA+2Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+2Sg@ PRONPer+NA+2Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+3Pl@ PRONPer+NA+3Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+3Sg@ PRONPer+NA+3Sg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+Excl@ PRONPer+NA+Excl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+Incl@ PRONPer+NA+Incl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONPret+NA@ PRONPret+NA_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ObvPl@ PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ObvSg@ PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ProxPl@ PRONSim+NA+ProxPl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ProxSg@ PRONSim+NA+ProxSg_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NI+Pl@ PRONSim+NI+Pl_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.PRONSim+NI+Sg@ PRONSim+NI+Sg_Prefix ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                                          !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

LEXICON PronounStems
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ObvPl@ PRONDem+NA+ObvPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ObvSg@ PRONDem+NA+ObvSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ProxPl@ PRONDem+NA+ProxPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NA+ProxSg@ PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NI+Pl@ PRONDem+NI+Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDem+NI+Sg@ PRONDem+NI+Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ObvPl@ PRONDub+NA+ObvPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ObvSg@ PRONDub+NA+ObvSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ProxPl@ PRONDub+NA+ProxPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NA+ProxSg@ PRONDub+NA+ProxSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NI+Pl@ PRONDub+NI+Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONDub+NI+Sg@ PRONDub+NI+Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NA+ProxPl@ PRONIndf+NA+ProxPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NA@ PRONIndf+NA_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONIndf+NI@ PRONIndf+NI_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ObvPl@ PRONInter+NA+ObvPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ObvSg@ PRONInter+NA+ObvSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ProxPl@ PRONInter+NA+ProxPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA+ProxSg@ PRONInter+NA+ProxSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NA@ PRONInter+NA_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NI+Pl@ PRONInter+NI+Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONInter+NI+Sg@ PRONInter+NI+Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+1Sg@ PRONPer+NA+1Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+2Pl@ PRONPer+NA+2Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+2Sg@ PRONPer+NA+2Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+3Pl@ PRONPer+NA+3Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+3Sg@ PRONPer+NA+3Sg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+Excl@ PRONPer+NA+Excl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPer+NA+Incl@ PRONPer+NA+Incl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONPret+NA@ PRONPret+NA_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ObvPl@ PRONSim+NA+ObvPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ObvSg@ PRONSim+NA+ObvSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ProxPl@ PRONSim+NA+ProxPl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NA+ProxSg@ PRONSim+NA+ProxSg_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NI+Pl@ PRONSim+NI+Pl_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.PRONSim+NI+Sg@ PRONSim+NI+Sg_Stems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                                          !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Stems
'a:'aw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
'aw PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
'awe PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
a' PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
a'a:a'aw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
a'aw PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
a'awe PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
a'awedi:a'awediw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
aw PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
awe PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
awedi:awediw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
wa'a:wa'aw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
wa'aw PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
wa'awe PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
wa'awedi:wa'awediw2 PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;
ya'aw PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg, Class: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Boundary
0:%>%> PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg, Class: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg, Class: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg                !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg, Class: PRONDem+NA+ProxSg, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Class=PRONDem+NA+ProxSg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+PRONDem+NA+ProxSg: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxPl                                          !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxPl_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ PRONDem+NA+ProxPl_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxPl                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRONDem+NA+ProxPl_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PronounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: PRONDem+NA+ProxPl                                          !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
